Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXI Agriculture and Animals
Grapes

260.165.
Kentucky Grape and Wine Council — Composition.

The Kentucky Grape and Wine Council is hereby created within the Department of Agriculture. The purpose of the council shall be to promote and facilitate the development of a Kentucky-based grape industry in the Commonwealth of Kentucky.

The council shall be composed of the Commissioner of Agriculture, or his designee, and nine (9) members appointed by the Governor. Of the nine (9) gubernatorial appointments, the Governor shall appoint one (1) from a list of three (3) candidates submitted by the director of the University of Kentucky Agriculture Experiment Station, one (1) from a list of three (3) candidates submitted by the secretary of the Tourism, Arts and Heritage Cabinet, three (3) winery operators from a list of six (6) candidates submitted by the Commissioner of Agriculture, two (2) grape producers from a list of four (4) candidates submitted by the Commissioner of Agriculture, and two (2) citizens at large.

Of the members appointed after January 1, 2007, three (3) members shall serve a term of one (1) year, two (2) shall serve a term of two (2) years, two (2) shall serve a term of three (3) years, and two (2) shall serve a term of four (4) years, as the Governor designates. Thereafter, appointed members shall serve terms of four (4) years and until their successors are appointed and qualify. A vacancy in an unexpired term shall be filled for the unexpired portion of the term in the same manner as the original appointment to that term.

The council shall select a chairman and shall meet at least once every three (3) months at the times and places the chairman designates. Six (6) members present at any meeting shall constitute a quorum. Upon the written request of any five (5) members, the chairman shall call a meeting of the council at the time and place requested.

The council may enact bylaws concerning the conduct of the council’s business and other administrative procedures as the council deems necessary.

Members shall receive no compensation but shall be reimbursed, payable from the Kentucky Grape and Wine Council fund, for any actual travel expense incurred while attending meetings of the council.

History.

Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 54, § 2, effective July 13, 1990; 1998, ch. 48, § 21, effective July 15, 1998; 2002, ch. 49, § 20, effective July 15, 2002; 2002, ch. 315, § 4, effective July 15, 2002; 2005, ch. 95, § 52, effective June 20, 2005; 2006, ch. 179, § 5, effective January 1, 2007; 2009, ch. 16, § 67, effective June 25, 2009.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(7/15/2002). This section was amended by 2002 Ky. Acts chs. 49 and 315, which are in conflict. Under KRS

446.250

, Acts ch. 315, which was last enacted by the General Assembly, prevails.

260.166.
Powers and duties of Kentucky Grape and Wine Council.

The Kentucky Grape and Wine Council, created in KRS

260.165

to promote and facilitate the development of a grape, grape products, and wine industry, may:

Conduct and contract with others to conduct research on grapes, grape products, and wine in Kentucky and elsewhere for use in Kentucky, including but not limited to:

Methods of marketing, market development, and distribution;

Methods of storage, refrigeration, processing, and transportation;

Methods of production and product development;

Methods of agronomic, enological, and viticultural practices to improve these practices in Kentucky; and

Economic benefits and impact from the industry;

Publish and provide and contract with others to publish and provide wholesalers and retailers in the Kentucky grape, grape products, and wine industry with information on proper methods of handling and selling grapes, grape products, and wine;

Publish and provide and contract with others to publish and provide producers of Kentucky grapes, grape products, and wine, as well as the general public, with information relating to Kentucky grapes, grape products, and wine; and

Design and implement or contract with others to design and implement activities relating to Kentucky grapes, grape products, and wine, including but not limited to:

Market surveys and analyses;

Industry promotion programs;

Market maintenance and expansion plans;

Education programs;

Public relations programs;

Economic impact analyses; and

Other analysis or research relating to the promotion and sale of Kentucky grapes, grape products, and wine.

The Kentucky Grape and Wine Council, to the extent that funds are available, shall:

Promote the sale of grapes, grape products, and wine for the purpose of maintaining and expanding present markets and creating new markets for Kentucky grapes, grape products, and wine for the maximum economic impact on the agricultural economy of Kentucky;

Inform the public, producers, and vendors about Kentucky grapes, grape products, and wine, including uses and benefits of these products;

Advise the Commissioner to:

Expend moneys from the Kentucky Grape and Wine Council fund created in KRS

260.168

to carry out the duties and recommendations of the council; and

Hire staff to carry out the duties and recommendations of the council; and

Promulgate administrative regulations to carry out the duties and recommendations of the council;

Coordinate with the Kentucky Department of Agriculture and other state agencies in carrying out these duties;

Report annually to the Governor and the General Assembly on the activities of the Kentucky Grape and Wine Council; and

Report by November 1 of each year to the Interim Joint Committee on Licensing and Occupations of the Kentucky General Assembly and the Agricultural Development Board on the coordination between Kentucky wineries and Kentucky wholesalers to promote the availability of Kentucky wine to retailers.

History.

Enact. Acts 2002, ch. 315, § 1, effective July 15, 2002; 2006, ch. 179, § 3, effective January 1, 2007.

260.167.
Duties of Commissioner relating to Kentucky Grape and Wine Council.

The Commissioner shall, to the extent that funds are available and with the advice and recommendation of the council:

Receive and disburse funds from the Kentucky Grape and Wine Council fund created in KRS

260.168

;

Hire staff to carry out the duties and recommendations of the council;

Promulgate administrative regulations to carry out the duties and recommendations of the council;

Assist in the preparation of the annual report of the council; and

Monitor the activities of the council to ensure timely performance of the duties of the council under KRS

260.166

.

History.

Enact. Acts 2002, ch. 315, § 2, effective July 15, 2002.

260.168.
Kentucky Grape and Wine Council fund.

There is established and created in the State Treasury, a fund entitled the “Kentucky Grape and Wine Council fund” to provide funds to offset the costs of the Kentucky Grape and Wine Council. The fund may receive state appropriations, gifts, grants, federal funds, and any other funds both public and private. Money deposited in the fund shall be disbursed by the State Treasurer upon the warrant of the Commissioner of Agriculture or the Commissioner’s representative. Any unallocated or unencumbered balances in the fund shall be invested as provided in KRS 42.500(9), and any income earned from the investments along with the unallotted or unencumbered balances in the fund shall not lapse, and shall be deemed a trust and agency account and made available solely for the purposes and benefits of the Kentucky Grape and Wine Council.

History.

Enact. Acts 2002, ch. 315, § 3, effective July 15, 2002.

260.170.
Testing of milk and cream. [Repealed.]

260.175.
Kentucky small farm wineries support fund.

The Kentucky small farm wineries support fund is created as a separate revolving fund. The support fund shall consist of amounts transferred to the fund pursuant to the provisions of subsection (2) of this section and any other proceeds from grants, contributions, appropriations, or other moneys made available for the purposes of the fund. Fund amounts not expended at the close of the fiscal year shall not lapse but shall be carried forward into the next fiscal year. Any interest earnings of the fund shall become a part of the fund and shall not lapse.

A total of four hundred thousand dollars ($400,000) shall be deposited in the Kentucky small farm wineries support fund each fiscal year from the general fund. The funds shall be used by the Kentucky Grape and Wine Council as follows:

Two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000) of these funds shall be used for the promotion, advertising, and marketing in Kentucky of wine produced by small farm wineries located in Kentucky. The Grape and Wine Council shall collaborate with the Kentucky Department of Agriculture and the Kentucky Department of Travel and Tourism to develop a marketing plan that shall include brand development, direct mail and e-marketing, Web site development, collateral brochures and maps, advertising, familiarization trips, a retail program, and any other topics that the marketing plan developers deem appropriate or that may be established through the promulgation of administrative regulations;

One hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) of these funds shall be used by the Grape and Wine Council, in collaboration with the Kentucky Department of Agriculture and the Kentucky Department of Travel and Tourism, to establish a local marketing cost-share program. For the purposes of this section, “local marketing cost-share program” means a mechanism to provide Kentucky small farm wineries with access to matching funds reimbursements for projects that promote and market their products. Standards for the application for, and receipt of, matching funds reimbursements authorized in this section shall be established through the promulgation of administrative regulations;

Twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) of these funds shall be used for funding the administrative costs of the Kentucky Grape and Wine Council. The costs shall include but not be limited to reimbursement for the council’s appointed members’ travel expenses while attending meetings of the council;

Seventy-five thousand dollars ($75,000) shall be used for the payment of fees to licensed wholesalers who apply to the Kentucky Grape and Wine Council to participate in a wine distribution program established by the Kentucky Grape and Wine Council. A licensed wholesaler shall apply and shall be eligible for consideration for the program. The licensed wholesaler shall agree to distribute the wine produced by small farm wineries licensed under KRS

243.155

and shall agree to sell the wine to retailers for the same price the wholesaler paid for the wine; and

The funds allocated to each purpose under paragraphs (a) to (d) of this subsection shall be used exclusively for the purpose designated. Use of the funds designated for each purpose shall be strictly adhered to, and the funds shall not be used to support any other purpose. If at the end of any fiscal year funds designated for one (1) of the purposes are unused, the unused funds shall not lapse and shall be carried forth to the succeeding year for the original purpose designated.

The Kentucky Grape and Wine Council shall advise the Commissioner of the Department of Agriculture regarding promulgation of administrative regulations necessary to carry out the provisions and purposes of subsection (2) of this section. The Department of Agriculture shall collaborate with the Kentucky Department of Travel and Tourism and the Kentucky Grape and Wine Council in developing any administrative regulations promulgated under the authority of this section.

History.

Enact. Acts 2006, ch. 179, § 4, effective January 1, 2007; 2009, ch. 16, § 68, effective June 25, 2009; 2010, ch. 65, § 6, effective July 15, 2010.

Official Comments

2022-2024 Budget Reference.

See State/Executive Branch Budget, 2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. I, A, 21, (4) at 1645.

260.180.
Milk buyer to employ licensed tester; license for tester. [Repealed.]

260.190.
Examining board. [Repealed.]

260.200.
Fraudulent manipulation of weights and unfair sampling prohibited. [Repealed.]

260.210.
Falsifying Babcock tests prohibited. [Repealed.]

260.220.
Standard and approved testing apparatus required; inspection fee. [Repealed.]

260.230.
Standard milk test bottles. [Repealed.]

260.240.
Standard cream test bottles. [Repealed.]

260.250.
Standard pipette. [Repealed.]

260.260.
Standard weight. [Repealed.]

260.270.
Experiment station to employ assistants and issue publications. [Repealed.]

260.300.
Definitions for KRS 260.300 to 260.390. [Repealed.]

260.310.
Kentucky Dairy Commission — Nonliability of state. [Repealed.]

260.320.
Powers and duties of commission. [Repealed.]

260.330.
Registration of handlers — Permits — Assessment on milk and butterfat. [Repealed.]

260.340.
Payment of money into revolving fund. [Repealed.]

260.350.
Bonds of commission officers, agents and employes. [Repealed.]

260.360.
Records — Returns to be filed. [Repealed.]

260.370.
Hearings — Revocation of permits. [Repealed.]

260.380.
Referendum on assessment. [Repealed.]

260.390.
Enforcement duties of Attorney General and Commonwealth’s attorney. [Repealed.]

260.400.
Definitions for KRS 260.400 to 260.530. [Repealed.]

260.410.
Prohibited practices by buyer. [Repealed.]

260.420.
Unlawful practices by sampler or weigher. [Repealed.]

260.430.
Unlawful practices by milk tester. [Repealed.]

260.440.
Buyer’s license — Application for — Issuance — Expiration. [Repealed.]

260.450.
Tester’s license required — Exception — Temporary permit. [Repealed.]

260.460.
License required for persons who weigh, measure or sample milk or cream — Application for license — Issuance — Expiration. [Repealed.]

260.470.
Testing equipment to be inspected by Experiment Station — Inspection fee. [Repealed.]

260.480.
License fees. [Repealed.]

260.490.
Director to enforce KRS 260.400 to 260.530 — Authority — Personnel — Rules and regulations. [Repealed.]

260.500.
Revocation or suspension of licenses. [Repealed.]

260.510.
Appeals fom orders of revocation. [Repealed.]

260.520.
Examining board — Duties — Membership — Appointment — Terms — Meetings — Quorum — Compensation. [Repealed.]

260.530.
Special fund — Expenditures. [Repealed.]